Massachusetts, session 194th, H4440.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Pursuant to chapter 3 § 5A the general laws of the Commonwealth,
notwithstanding the provisions of any other general or special law to the contrary, the
conservation commission of the Town of Billerica may transfer to the Select Board of the Town
of Billerica, for recreational purposes and subject to Article 97 of the amendments of the
constitution of the Commonwealth, certain lands being shown as “E-23”, “FP-9”, and “PUE-5”
on a plan of land titled “Massachusetts Department of Transportation Highway Division Plan
and Profile of Yankee Doodle Bike Path in the Town of Billerica, Middlesex County,
Preliminary Right of Way Plans” being a portion of those parcels owned by the Town of
Billerica and described in the Assessor's records of the Town of Billerica as Parcel ID: 78-282-1-
1, Parcel ID: 87-258-1 & Parcel ID: 87-249-2.
of 2

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2